Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-636
Pumping for irrigation purposes; Legislature; finding.

The Legislature finds that the pumping of water for irrigation purposes from water wells located within fifty feet of the bank of a channel of any natural stream may have a direct effect on the surface flow of such stream.

Laws 1963, c. 275, § 1, p. 828;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 16;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 7.

For additional definitions, see section 46-706.